Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201847-634
Receipt of funds
by local entity; local advisory committee required; plan required.

For a local entity to receive funds under the Community Corrections
Act, the division shall ensure there
is a local advisory committee made up of a broad base of community members
concerned with the justice system. Submission of a detailed plan including
a budget, program standards, and policies as developed by the local advisory
committee shall be required as set forth
by the division. Such funds shall
be used for the implementation of the recommendations of the division, the
expansion of sentencing options, the education of the public, the provision
of supplemental community-based corrections programs, and the promotion of
coordination between state and county community-based corrections programs.

Laws 2006, LB 1113, § 48;

Laws 2011, LB390, § 14.